Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.050

Powers of remaining executors on removal of associate.

When any of the executors named shall not qualify or having qualified shall become disqualified or be removed, the remaining executor or executors shall have the authority to perform every act and discharge every trust required by the will, and their acts shall be effectual for every purpose.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.28.050. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 54; RRS s 1424; prior: Code 1881 s 1372; 1854 p 268 s 5.]